Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.150

Nonrecourse revenue bonds—Financing documents, scope.

The authority may enter into financing documents with borrowers regarding bonds issued by the authority that may provide for the payment by each borrower of amounts sufficient, together with other revenues available to the authority, if any, to: (1) Pay the borrower's share of the fees established by the authority; (2) pay the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on outstanding bonds of the authority issued in respect of such borrower as the same shall become due and payable; and (3) create and maintain reserves required or provided for by the authority in connection with the issuance of such bonds. The payments shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any department, committee, board, body, bureau, or agency of the state other than the authority.

[ 1989 c 279 s 16.]